Utah statutes.
9-4-801.   Creation.
(1)  There is created the Homeless Coordinating Committee.
(2) (a)  The committee shall consist of the state planning coordinator, the
state superintendent of public instruction, the chair of the board of trustees
of the Utah Housing Corporation, and the executive directors of the Department
of Human Services, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Community
and Culture, the Department of Workforce Services, and the Department of
Health, or their designees.
(b)  The governor shall appoint the chair from among these members.
(3)  The governor may also appoint as members of the committee representatives
of local governments, local housing authorities, local law enforcement
agencies, and of federal and private agencies and organizations concerned with
the homeless, mentally ill, elderly, single-parent families, substance
abusers, and persons with a disability.
(4) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (4)(b), as terms of current
committee members expire, the governor shall appoint each new member or
reappointed member to a four-year term.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (4)(a), the governor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that
approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.
(c)  A person appointed under this Subsection (4) may not be appointed to
serve more than three consecutive terms.
(5)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
